New York, session 2025-2026, A9580.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1367-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and 2 breeding law is amended by adding a new subdivision 6-a to read as 3 follows: 4 6-a. (a) Each mobile sports wagering licensee shall collect and submit 5 anonymized player-level data related to sports wagering activity to the 6 commission, on or before February twenty-eighth of each calendar year. 7 Such data shall report on player characteristics including, but not 8 limited to: 9 (i) gender, age and region of residence; 10 (ii) player behavior including, but not limited to, frequency of play, 11 length of play, speed of play, local time of play, amounts wagered; and 12 (iii) for each wager, whether the wager was: 13 (1) made during the sports contest or before the contest began; or 14 (2) a parlay wager; and 15 (iv) any other information the commission determines necessary to 16 evaluate the impact of mobile sports wagering on problem gambling. 17 (b) The data submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be anonym- 18 ized to prevent the identification of individual users. No personally 19 identifiable information shall be collected or disclosed. 20 (c) The data submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be made 21 available by the commission to academic researchers, upon request, for 22 the purposes of studying the impact of mobile sports wagering on problem 23 gambling. Such data is not a public record, and no researcher receiving 24 data pursuant to this subdivision shall disclose such data to any 25 person, except for the purpose of conducting the research described in 26 this paragraph. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14400-01-6 A. 9580 2 1 (d) The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to 2 implement the provisions of this subdivision. 3 (e) In the event a mobile sports wagering licensee fails to annually 4 submit such data to the commission as required pursuant to this subdivi- 5 sion, the commission may suspend such operator's license until such time 6 as the operator provides that data. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.